apertium-eng-hin.eng.dix
<pardef n="prod__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ding</l>      <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ing</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ded</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ed</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ded</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ed</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>


<pardef n="hug__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ged</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ged</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ging</l>      <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>


<pardef n="dict/um__n">
  <e>       <p><l>um</l>        <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR">       <p><l>ums</l>       <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="gen__apos"/></e>
</pardef>




<!-- Tiu cxi estas por 'winnings', growings kiu nepre NE estu analizita kiel nomo en singularo -->
<pardef n="up_pl__n">
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="gen__apos"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="spokespe/rson__n">
  <e>       <p><l>rson</l>      <r>rson<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ople</l>      <r>rson<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR">       <p><l>oples</l>     <r>rson<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="gen__apos"/></e>
  <e r="LR">       <p><l>rsons</l>     <r>rson<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="gen__apos"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="gruel/ling__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>ling</l>      <r>ling<s n="adj"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ing</l>       <r>ling<s n="adj"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="hepatiti/s__n">
  <e>       <p><l>des</l>       <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="gen__apos"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="fuel__vblex">
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ling</l>      <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ing</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>led</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR">       <p><l>ed</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>led</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e  r="LR">       <p><l>ed</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="medal/list__n">
  <e>       <p><l>list</l>      <r>list<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ist</l>       <r>list<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="gen__apos"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>lists</l>     <r>list<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="gen__apos"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ists</l>      <r>list<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="gen__apos"/></e>
</pardef>




<pardef n="trot__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ted</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ed</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ted</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ed</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ting</l>      <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ing</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>


<pardef n="fr/y__n">
  <e>       <p><l>y</l>         <r>y<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ies</l>       <r>y<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="gen__apos"/></e>
</pardef>


<pardef n="ram__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ming</l>      <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>med</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>med</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="to/y__n">
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ies</l>       <r>y<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="gen__apos"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ys</l>        <r>y<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="gen__apos"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>y</l>         <r>y<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="rumo/ur__n">
  <e r="LR"><p><l>r</l>         <r>ur<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ur</l>        <r>ur<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>rs</l>        <r>ur<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="gen__apos"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>urs</l>       <r>ur<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="gen__apos"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="ago__adv">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ly</l>        <r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>


<pardef n="panic__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ked</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ked</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>king</l>      <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="pl/y__vblex"><e><par n="appl/y__vblex"/></e></pardef>

<pardef n="fib/re__n">
  <e>       <p><l>ers</l>       <r>re<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="gen__apos"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r>re<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="ax/e__n">
  <e>       <p><l>es</l>        <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="gen__apos"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="hoo/f__n">
  <e>       <p><l>fs</l>        <r>f<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="gen__apos"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ves</l>       <r>f<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="gen__apos"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>f</l>         <r>f<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="s/ceptical__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>keptical</l>  <r>ceptical<s n="adj"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="grip/e__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>es</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ed</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ed</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ing</l>       <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="alfresco">        <i>alfresco</i><par n="ago__adv"/></e>
<e lm="all">                  <i>all</i><par n="ago__adv"/></e>
<e lm="annexe">          <i>annex</i><par n="ax/e__n"/></e>
<e lm="arthritis">       <i>arthriti</i><par n="hepatiti/s__n"/></e>
<e lm="authenticity">    <i>authenticit</i><par n="fr/y__n"/></e>
<e lm="barrel">          <i>barrel</i><par n="fuel__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="behalf">          <i>behal</i><par n="hoo/f__n"/></e>
<e lm="both">            <i>both</i><par n="ago__adv"/></e>
<e lm="channel">         <i>channel</i><par n="fuel__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="chimney">         <i>chimne</i><par n="to/y__n"/></e>
<e lm="chisel">          <i>chisel</i><par n="fuel__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="colloquy">        <i>colloqu</i><par n="fr/y__n"/></e>
<e lm="comply">          <i>compl</i><par n="pl/y__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="convoy">          <i>convo</i><par n="to/y__n"/></e>
<e lm="cram">            <i>cram</i><par n="ram__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="decry">           <i>decr</i><par n="pl/y__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="dependent">       <i>dependent</i><par n="up_pl__n"/></e>
<e lm="dictum">          <i>dict</i><par n="dict/um__n"/></e>
<e lm="distillery">      <i>distiller</i><par n="fr/y__n"/></e>
<e lm="dog">                  <i>dog</i><par n="hug__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="endeavour">       <i>endeavo</i><par n="rumo/ur__n"/></e>
<e lm="ferry">           <i>ferr</i><par n="pl/y__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="fog">                  <i>fog</i><par n="hug__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="fry">             <i>fr</i><par n="fr/y__n"/></e>
<e lm="fuel">            <i>fuel</i><par n="fuel__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="grief">           <i>grie</i><par n="hoo/f__n"/></e>
<e lm="gripe">           <i>grip</i><par n="grip/e__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="growing">         <i>growing</i><par n="up_pl__n"/></e>
<e lm="gruelling">       <i>gruel</i><par n="gruel/ling__adj"/></e>
<e lm="hoof">            <i>hoo</i><par n="hoo/f__n"/></e>
<e lm="impel">           <i>impel</i><par n="fuel__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="improbability">   <i>improbabilit</i><par n="fr/y__n"/></e>
<e lm="initial">         <i>initial</i><par n="fuel__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="lag">             <i>lag</i><par n="hug__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="legality">        <i>legalit</i><par n="fr/y__n"/></e>
<e lm="levy">            <i>lev</i><par n="pl/y__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="lug">             <i>lug</i><par n="hug__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="marvel">          <i>marvel</i><par n="fuel__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="medallist">       <i>medal</i><par n="medal/list__n"/></e>
<e lm="mischief">        <i>mischie</i><par n="hoo/f__n"/></e>
<e lm="mollify">         <i>mollif</i><par n="pl/y__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="nursery">         <i>nurser</i><par n="fr/y__n"/></e>
<e lm="panic">           <i>panic</i><par n="panic__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="parallel">        <i>parallel</i><par n="fuel__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="ploy">            <i>plo</i><par n="to/y__n"/></e>
<e lm="preoccupy">       <i>preoccup</i><par n="pl/y__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="prod">            <i>prod</i><par n="prod__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="rally">           <i>rall</i><par n="pl/y__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="rectify">         <i>rectif</i><par n="pl/y__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="relevancy">       <i>relevanc</i><par n="fr/y__n"/></e>
<e lm="sceptical">       <i>s</i><par n="s/ceptical__adj"/></e>
<e lm="sag">             <i>sag</i><par n="hug__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="speaking">        <i>speaking</i><par n="up_pl__n"/></e>
<e lm="spectre">         <i>spect</i><par n="fib/re__n"/></e>
<e lm="spokesperson">    <i>spokespe</i><par n="spokespe/rson__n"/></e>
<e lm="spot">            <i>spot</i><par n="trot__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="stem">            <i>stem</i><par n="ram__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="tag">             <i>tag</i><par n="hug__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="tally">           <i>tall</i><par n="pl/y__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="tenfold">         <i>tenfold</i><par n="ago__adv"/></e>
<e lm="threefold">       <i>threefold</i><par n="ago__adv"/></e>
<e lm="total">           <i>total</i><par n="fuel__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="tug">             <i>tug</i><par n="hug__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="veracity">        <i>veracit</i><par n="fr/y__n"/></e>
<e lm="winning">         <i>winning</i><par n="up_pl__n"/></e>
<e lm="working">         <i>working</i><par n="up_pl__n"/></e>
